Maryland, session 2025, HB1267.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve and from then through January 1;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1267*

HOUSE BILL 1267
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
(v) The Friday before Easter and from then through the Monday
after Easter;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) (I) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different
days, the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(II) EACH COUNTY BOARD MAY DESIGNATE VETERANS’ DAY AS
A PUBLIC SCHOOL HOLIDAY.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) IF THE COUNTY BOARD HAS NOT DESIGNATED VETERANS’
DAY AS A PUBLIC SCHOOL HOLIDAY, Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public schools,
in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general election
days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;

HOUSE BILL 1267 3
(v) Talbot; and
(vi) Worcester.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.